District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Pay Our Youth a Fair Summer Wage Amendment Act of 2025.”.
Sec. 2. Section 2a(a) of The Youth Employment Act of 1979, effective January 5, 1980
(D.C. Law 3-46; D.C. Official Code § 32-242(a)(1)(A)) is amended as follows:
(a) Sub-subparagraph 2a(a)(1)(A)(ii) is amended by striking the amount “$6.25” and
inserting “$10.00”;
(b) Strike Sub-subparagraph 2a(a)(1)(A)(iii);
(c) Sub-subparagraph 2a(a)(1)(A)(iv) is amended by striking the phrase “Youth 22
through 24 years of age” and inserting the phrase “Youth 16 through 24 years of age”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.

The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813: D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.